District of Columbia statutes.
7-2812

Notice of violation.

(a)

The Mayor may issue a notice of violation to any person who violates a provision of this chapter.

(b)

A notice of violation shall:

(1)

State the nature of the violation; and

(2)

Describe the procedures provided in this section and § 7-2813.

(c)

A notice of violation shall be the summons and complaint for purposes of this chapter. A duplicate of the notice of violation shall be served personally on the person to whom it is issued as provided in subsection (d) of this section. The original or a facsimile thereof shall be filed with the Office of the Corporation Counsel and shall be deemed a record kept in the ordinary course of business and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts contained therein.

(d)

A notice of violation shall be served personally upon the alleged violator. If the alleged violator is not present the notice of violation shall be served by affixing such notice to the place of business (in the case of an alarm dealer or agent) or to the scene (in the case of an alarm user) in a conspicuous place.

(e)

A person shall answer a notice of violation within 15 days by:

(1)

Depositing and forfeiting collateral in an amount established by rule or order of the Mayor; or

(2)

Depositing collateral in an amount established by rule or order of the Mayor and requesting the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to set a trial date.

(f)

The Mayor shall prescribe the form for the notice of violation. A Mayor’s rule or order establishing the amount of collateral shall become effective at expiration of 30 days unless the Council of the District of Columbia shall, during such period, adopt a resolution disapproving such Mayor’s rule or order.

History

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 13, 27 DCR 3760
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-99, § 2(n), 35 DCR 1051
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 22, 36 DCR 492

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2813, § 7-2814, and § 7-2815.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3112.